Missouri, session 2026, HB3210.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 82, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 82.298, to read as follows:
82.298. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Safe
Neighborhoods Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Affected city", a city to which a property owner is submitting a claim
provided under this section;
(2) "Fair market value", the value of the property after considering comparable
sales in the area, capitalization of income, and replacement cost less depreciation,
singularly or in combination, as appropriate, and additionally considering the value of
the property based upon its highest and best use, using generally accepted appraisal
practices;
(3) "Just compensation", for purposes of an action for diminution in value, the
sum of money that is equal to the reduction in fair market value of the property
resulting from the adoption of the policy, pattern, or practice or maintenance of public
nuisance;
(4) "Property owner", the holder of fee title to real property.
3. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a property owner or triple net
leaseholder located in a city with more than one hundred thousand inhabitants may
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3210 2
submit a claim for compensation in an amount determined under subsection 4 of this
section if either of the following occurs:
(1) The city in which the real property is located adopts and follows a policy,
pattern, or practice of declining to enforce existing laws, ordinances, or other legislation
prohibiting illegal public camping, obstructing public thoroughfares, loitering,
panhandling, public urination or defecation, public consumption of alcoholic
beverages, possession or use of illegal substances, or shoplifting, or if the city in
which the real property is located maintains a public nuisance and the property owner
incurs documented expenses to mitigate the effects of such policy, pattern, practice, or
public nuisance on the property owner's real property; or
(2) The city in which the real property is located adopts and follows a policy,
pattern, or practice of declining to enforce existing laws, ordinances, or other legislation
prohibiting illegal public camping, obstructing public thoroughfares, loitering,
panhandling, public urination or defecation, public consumption of alcoholic
beverages, possession or use of illegal substances or shoplifting, or if the city in which
the real property is located maintains a public nuisance, and the fair market value of the
owner’s private real property is reduced by this policy, pattern, practice, or public
nuisance.
4. The amount of compensation to which the property owner is entitled shall be,
at the owner’s election, equal to:
(1) The documented expenses incurred by the property owner that were
reasonably necessary to mitigate the effects of the policy, pattern, practice, or public
nuisance on the property owner's real property; or
(2) The reduction in fair market value of the property resulting from the city’s
policy, pattern, practice, or public nuisance.
5. The compensation allowed under this section:
(1) Is in lieu of any claim for monetary damages; and
(2) Shall not exceed the amount the property owner paid for the prior tax year in
primary property taxes for the tax year to the affected city. If the total amount of
compensation determined under subsection 4 of this section is more than the amount the
property owner paid for the prior tax year in primary property taxes to the affected city
for the tax year and the claim is accepted, the affected city shall pay the property owner
an amount equal to the amount the property owner paid for the prior tax year in
primary property tax to the affected city. The property owner shall submit a claim for
the remaining portion of the compensation in successive tax years, as applicable.
6. Within thirty days after a property owner submits a written claim for
compensation to the affected city in a specific amount for reimbursement of mitigation

HCS HB 3210 3
expenses or just compensation, the affected city shall accept or reject the claim. If the
affected city:
(1) Accepts the claim, the affected city shall pay the amount requested to the
property owner; or
(2) Rejects the claim or does not respond to the claim within the thirty-day
period, the property owner may file a cause of action in the trial court of the county in
which the real property is located to challenge the rejection of the claim. The questions
of whether the property owner is entitled to the compensation and whether the amount
of the claim is reasonable are judicial questions. In a cause of action filed under this
subsection:
(a) The city shall bear the burden of demonstrating that its actions are lawful or
that the amount of the claim is unreasonable;
(b) The property owner shall not be liable to the city for attorney's fees or costs;
and
(c) A prevailing property owner shall be awarded reasonable attorney's fees and
costs.
7. The property owner shall not be required to submit any claim besides that
prescribed in subsection 3 of this section as a prerequisite to demanding or receiving
reimbursement for mitigation expenses or just compensation pursuant to this section.
8. A property owner may submit a claim under this section once per tax year.
9. If the policy, pattern, practice, or public nuisance remains in place after the
property owner submits a claim under this section, the property owner shall be entitled
to additional compensation under this section in a subsequent tax year, unless the
affected city and the property owner enter into a knowing and voluntary settlement, or
the affected city ends the policy, pattern, or practice or abates the public nuisance.
10. The remedy established by this section is in addition to any other remedy
that is provided by the laws and Constitution of this state or the United States and is not
intended to modify or replace any other remedy.
11. Nothing in this section prohibits the property owner from entering into a
knowing and voluntary settlement with the relevant city for an amount less than the
property owner requested in the claim submitted under subsection 3 of this section.
12. This section shall not apply to:
(1) Decisions by city authorities to exercise prosecutorial discretion not to
prosecute alleged offenders if such discretion is exercised on a case-by-case basis and the
justifications for each decision are published on a monthly basis by the city;
(2) Acts of executive clemency; or

HCS HB 3210 4
(3) Acts or omissions mandated by federal law.
✔